Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1110
Gambling; prosecution; not in violation of jurisdiction where conducted; no defense.

It shall be no defense to a prosecution under any provision of this article relating to gambling that the gambling is conducted outside this state and is not in violation of the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is conducted.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 226;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 194.